North Dakota, session 69, SB2274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 4.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Farm management program.
The commissioner shall implement and oversee a program to:
1. Coordinate new and existing farm management programs offered by a state agency, board, or
commission; and
2. Create and expand marketing clubs as adjuncts to new and existing farm management
programs.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 15-20.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15-20.1-03. Powers and duties of state board relating to career and technical education.
The state board shall have all authority necessary to cooperate with the United States department
of education or other department or agency of the United States of America in the administration of acts
of Congress relating to career and technical education, including the following powers and duties:
1. To administer any legislation enacted by the legislative assembly of this state pursuant to or in
conformity with acts of Congress relating to career and technical education.
2. To administer the funds provided by the federal government and by this state for the promotion
of career and technical education and to contract with:
a. Any public or private institution or agency, board of trustees of any agricultural and
training school, or school district of this state; or
b. Any public or private institution or agency, or political subdivision, of another state.
3. To formulate plans for the promotion of career and technical education in such subjects as are
an essential and integral part of the public school system of education in this state.
4. To provide for the preparation of teachers.
5. To fix the compensation of such officers and assistants as may be necessary to administer the
federal acts and the provisions of this chapter relating to career and technical education and to
pay the same and other necessary expenses of administration from any funds appropriated for
such purpose.
6. To make studies and investigations relating to career and technical education.

S. B. NO. 2274 - PAGE 2
7. To promote and aid in the establishment of schools, departments, or classes, and to cooperate
with local communities in the maintenance of career and technical education schools,
departments, or classes.
8. To prescribe the qualifications and provide for the certification of teachers, directors, and
supervisors.
9. To cooperate with governing bodies of school districts and with organizations and communities
in the maintenance of classes for the preparation of teachers, directors, and supervisors of
career and technical education, to maintain classes for such purposes under its own direction
and control, and to establish and control, by general regulations, the qualifications to be
possessed by persons engaged in the training of career and technical education teachers.
10. To coordinate new and existing farm management programs offered by any state agency or
entity.
11. To create and expand marketing clubs as adjuncts to new and existing farm management
programs.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - AGRICULTURE COMMISSIONER - FARM MANAGEMENT
PROGRAM. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, the sum of $1,900,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
agriculture commissioner for the purpose of paying for services related to the farm management
program, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

S. B. NO. 2274 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2274.
Senate Vote: Yeas 42 Nays 2 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 81 Nays 10 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State